Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1712
Fire training school; jointly sponsored; trainees; costs and expenses.

Any city or village in the State of Nebraska may pay from municipal funds the cost of training and the expenses of such members from each fire company as designated by its governing body to attend the fire training school jointly sponsored by the Nebraska State Volunteer Firefighter's Association, the State Fire Marshal, the Nebraska Forest Service-Fire Control, a division of the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources, and the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency and held periodically at the state fire training school.

Laws 1959, c. 58, § 1, p. 251;

Laws 1961, c. 53, § 5, p. 199;

Laws 1963, c. 83, § 1, p. 291;

Laws 1994, LB 1027, § 1;

Laws 1996, LB 43, § 2.